Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.150

Sale of impounded animal—Retroactive effect.

If no person shall claim the animal within ten days after the date of publication or posting of the notice, it shall be sold at the next succeeding public livestock market sale to be held at the sales yard where impounded, provided that in the director's discretion the department of agriculture may otherwise cause the animal to be sold at public sale.

The legislature intends this to be a clarification of existing law; therefore, this section shall have retroactive effect as of December 1, 1994.

[ 1995 c 374 s 70; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 17; 1951 c 31 s 6. Formerly RCW 16.13.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 69, 70, and 72-79: See note following RCW 16.24.130.